Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-152
Keya Paha.

The county of Keya Paha is bounded as follows: Commencing in the middle of the channel of the Niobrara River where the line dividing ranges sixteen and seventeen, west, of sixth principal meridian crosses said Niobrara River; thence north to the forty-third parallel of north latitude; thence west along said parallel of north latitude to the line dividing range twenty-four from range twenty-five, west, of sixth principal meridian; thence south along said line to the middle of the channel of the Niobrara River; thence down the middle of the channel of the Niobrara River to the place of beginning.

Formed from Brown County pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 4, 1884;

Laws 1893, c. 13, § 1, p. 146;

R.S.1913, § 865;

C.S.1922, § 767;

C.S.1929, § 25-154;

R.S.1943, § 22-152.